ro-RO: Standard de certificare: FIA (standard nespecificat); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Fără rezistență la foc / necertificat; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Altele
es: Norma de certificación: FIA (estándar no especificado); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; No resistente al fuego / no certificado; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Otro
sk-SK: Certifikačná norma: FIA (nešpecifikovaná norma); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Neodolné voči ohňu/necertifikované; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Iné
nb: Sertifiseringsstandard: FIA (uspesifisert standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ikke brannsikker / ikke sertifisert; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Annet
da: Certificeringsstandard: FIA (uspecificeret standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ikke brandhæmmende / ikke certificeret; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Andet
en: Certification standard: FIA (unspecified standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Not fire resistant / not certified; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Other
pt-PT: Norma de certificação: FIA (norma não especificada); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Não resistente ao fogo/não certificado; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Outro
pl: Norma certyfikacji: FIA (nieokreślony standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Brak ognioodporności / bez certyfikatu; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Inne
tr: Sertifikasyon standardı: FIA (belirtilmemiş standart); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ateşe dayanıklı değil / sertifikasız; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Diğer
lt-LT: Sertifikavimo standartas: FIA (nenurodytas standartas); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Neatsparus ugniai / nesertifikuota; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Kita
el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης: FIA (μη καθορισμένο πρότυπο); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Μη πυράντοχο / μη πιστοποιημένο; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Άλλο
ja: 認証基準: FIA (規格未指定); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 耐火性なし / 未認証; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; その他
it: Standard di certificazione: FIA (standard non specificato); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Non resistente al fuoco / non certificato; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Altro
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертифициране: FIA (неуточнен стандарт); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Неогнеупорни / несертифицирани; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Други
de: Zertifizierungsstandard: FIA (nicht spezifizierter Standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Nicht feuerfest / nicht zertifiziert; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Sonstiges
hu: Tanúsítási szabvány: FIA (nem specifikált szabvány); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Nem tűzálló / Nem hitelesített; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Egyéb
zh-CN: 认证标准: FIA（未指定标准）; FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 不防火 / 未认证; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; 其他
cs: Certifikační standard: FIA (nespecifikovaná norma); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Není ohnivzdorné / bez certifikace; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Jiné
hr-HR: Standard certifikacije: FIA (neodređeni standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Nije otporno na vatru / nema certifikat; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Ostalo
nl: Certificeringsstandaard: FIA (ongespecificeerde norm); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Niet brandwerend/niet gecertificeerd; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Overig
th: มาตรฐานการรับรอง: FIA (ไม่ระบุมาตรฐาน); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; ไม่ทนไฟ / ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 認證標準: FIA (未指定標準); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 不防火 / 未認證; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; 其他
pt-BR: Padrão de certificação: FIA (padrão não especificado); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Não resistente a fogo / não certificado; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Outro
ko: 인증 기준: FIA(표준 미지정); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; 내화성 없음/미인증; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; 기타
fi: Sertifiointistandardi: FIA (määrittämätön standardi); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ei tulenkestävä / ei sertifioitu; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Muu
ru: Стандарт сертификации: FIA (без указания стандарта); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Неогнестойкий / без сертификации; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Другое
sl-SI: Standard certificiranja: FIA (neopredeljen standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Ni ognjevarno / ni certificirano; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Drugo
fr: Norme de certification: FIA (norme non spécifiée); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Non ignifugé/non certifié; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Autre
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận: FIA (tiêu chuẩn không xác định); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Không chống cháy / không được chứng nhận; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Khác
sv: Certifieringsstandard: FIA (ospecificerad standard); FIA 8856-2000; FIA 8856-2018; Inte brandtålig / ej certifierad; SFI 3.3; SFI 3.3/1; SFI 3.3/10; SFI 3.3/15; SFI 3.3/5; Övrigt